Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.053

Proceedings subject to administrative procedure act—Exemptions.

(1) All rule-making proceedings conducted under this chapter shall be in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) Rule-making proceedings conducted under this chapter are exempt from compliance with RCW 34.05.310, chapter 19.85 RCW, the regulatory fairness act, and RCW 43.135.055 when adoption of the rule is determined by a referendum vote of the affected parties.

(3) The director may adopt amendments to marketing orders without conducting a referendum if the amendments are adopted under the following criteria:

(a) The proposed amendments relate only to internal administration of a marketing order and are not subject to violation by a person;

(b) The proposed amendments adopt or incorporate by reference without material change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, or rules of other Washington state agencies, if the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same activities as are authorized under the marketing order;

(c) The proposed amendments only correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing the marketing order;

(d) The content of the proposed amendments is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute.

A marketing order shall not be amended without a referendum to provide that a majority of the commodity commission members be appointed by the director.

[ 2002 c 313 s 43.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.